Washington statutes.
RCW 14.08.190

Establishment of airports on waters and reclaimed land.

(1) The powers herein granted to a municipality to establish and maintain airports shall include the power to establish and maintain such airports in, over and upon any public waters of this state within the limits or jurisdiction of or bordering on the municipality, any submerged land under such public waters, and any artificial or reclaimed land which before the artificial making or reclamation thereof constituted a portion of the submerged land under such public waters, and as well the power to construct and maintain terminal buildings, landing floats, causeways, roadways and bridges for approaches to or connecting with the airport, and landing floats and breakwaters for the protection of any such airport.

(2) All the other powers herein granted municipalities with reference to airports on land are granted to them with reference to such airports in, over and upon public waters, submerged land under public waters, and artificial or reclaimed land.

[ 1945 c 182 s 10; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2722-39.]